Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 743B.505 is amended to read:
743B.505. (1) [ An insurer ] A  carrier  offering [ a] an individual or group  health benefit plan in
this state that provides  coverage [ to individuals or to small employers, as defined in ORS
743B.005,] through a specified network of health care providers shall:
(a) Contract with or employ a network of providers that is sufficient in number, geographic
distribution and types of providers to ensure that all covered services under the health benefit  plan,
including mental  health , [ and] substance [ abuse treatment, ] use disorder and reproductive health
care and treatment,  are accessible :
(A) To  all enrollees for initial and follow-up appointments [ without unreasonable delay. ]; and
(B) In an appropriate and culturally competent  manner to all enrollees, including those
with diverse cultural and ethnic backgrounds, varying sexual orientations and  gender iden-
tities, disabilities or physical or mental health conditions.
(b)(A) With respect  to health benefit plans offered through the health insurance exchange under
ORS 741.310, contract  with a sufficient number and geographic distribution of essential community
providers, where available, to ensure  reasonable and timely access to a broad range of essential
community providers for low-income, medically underserved  individuals in the plan’s service area in
accordance with the network adequacy  standards established by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services;
(B) If the health benefit plan offered through the health insurance exchange offers a majority
of the covered services through physicians employed by  the [ insurer] carrier  or through a single
contracted medical group, have a sufficient number  and geographic distribution of employed or
contracted providers and hospital facilities to ensure reasonable and timely access  for low-income,
medically underserved enrollees in the plan’s service area, in accordance with  network adequacy
standards adopted by the department [ of Consumer and Business Services ]; or
(C) With respect to health benefit plans offered outside of the health insurance exchange, con-
tract with or employ a network of  providers that is sufficient in number, geographic distribution and
types of providers to ensure access to care  by enrollees who reside in locations within the health
benefit plan’s service area that are [ designated by the Health Resources and Services  Administration
Enrolled Senate Bill 822 (SB 822-A) Page 1
of the United States Department of Health and Human Services as ] health professional  shortage areas
or low-income zip codes , as prescribed by the department by rule .
(c) Annually report to the department [ of Consumer and Business Services ], in the  format pre-
scribed by the department, the [ insurer’s] carrier’s  network of providers for each health benefit
plan.
(2)(a) [ An insurer ] A  carrier  may not discriminate with respect to participation under a health
benefit plan or  coverage under the plan against any health care provider who is acting within the
scope of the provider’s license or certification in this state.
(b) This subsection does not require  [ an insurer ] a carrier  to contract with any health care
provider who is willing to abide by the [ insurer’s] carrier’s terms and conditions  for participation
established by the [ insurer] carrier.
(c) This subsection  does not prevent [ an insurer ] a carrier  from establishing varying re-
imbursement rates based on quality or performance measures.
(d) Rules adopted by  the department [ of Consumer and Business Services ] to implement this
[section] subsection  shall be consistent with the provisions of 42 U.S.C. 300gg-5 and the rules
adopted by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the United States De-
partment of the Treasury or the United States  Department of Labor to carry out 42 U.S.C. 300gg-5
that are in effect on January 1, [ 2017] 2025.
(3) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall [ use one  of the following methods
in] conduct  an annual evaluation of whether the network of providers available to enrollees  in a
health benefit plan meets the requirements of this section[ :]
[(a) An approach by which an insurer submits  evidence that the insurer is complying with at least
one of the factors prescribed by the department by rule from each of the following categories: ]
[(A) Access to care consistent with the needs of the enrollees served by the network; ]
[(B) Consumer satisfaction; ]
[(C) Transparency; and ]
[(D) Quality of care and cost containment; or ]
[(b) A ] using a  nationally recognized standard adopted by  the department and adjusted, as
necessary, to reflect the age demographics of the enrollees in the plan.
(4)(a)(A) The department shall adopt  by rule standards for evaluating, under subsection
(3) of this  section, the adequacy of a carrier’s network of providers in meeting the require-
ments of subsection (1) of this section and ensuring access by enrollees to initial  and
follow-up care without unreasonable delay. Standards shall be consistent with federal  stand-
ards, including 45  C.F.R. 156.230, as in effect on January 1, 2025, but may incorporate flexi-
bility to address issues specific to this state. Standards shall account for designations of a
health professional shortage area and access to services  based on provider and specialist
availability in a geographic area.
(B) The standards may include but are not limited to:
(i) Standards for geographic access to ensure  that specified providers are located within
a reasonable distance of the homes or workplaces of  all the enrollees in the carrier’s plans;
and
(ii) Specific limits on the amount of  time an enrollee must wait to be seen between re-
questing care and receiving care.
(C) The standards shall include standards for the scope and extent of  telemedicine ser-
vices, including behavioral health services that carriers may use to demonstrate compliance
with network adequacy standards described in this section.  As used in this subparagraph,
“telemedicine” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743A.058.
[(4)] (b)  [ In evaluating an insurer’s ] Standards adopted by the department by rule to evalu-
ate a carrier’s  network of  mental and behavioral health providers under subsection (3) of this
section[ , the department shall ] must  ensure that the network includes[ :]
[(a)] an adequate number and geographic distribution  in all  geographic areas where the car-
rier offers plans , as prescribed by  the department by rule, of licensed professional counselors, li-
Enrolled Senate Bill 822 (SB 822-A) Page 2
censed  marriage  and family therapists, licensed clinical social workers, psychologists and
psychiatrists who are accepting new patients, based on the needs of the  [ insureds under the policy
or certificate ] enrollees in the carrier’s plans , including but not limited to providers who can  ad-
dress the needs of:
(A) Children and adults;
(B) Individuals with limited English proficiency or who are illiterate;
(C) Individuals with diverse cultural or ethnic backgrounds;
(D) Individuals with chronic or complex behavioral health conditions; and
(E) Other groups specified by the department by rule[ ; and ].
[(b) An adequate number of the providers described in paragraph (a) of this subsection in all ge-
ographic areas where the insurer offers plans. ]
(5) This  section does not require [ an insurer ] a carrier to contract with an essential community
provider that refuses to accept the [ insurer’s] carrier’s  generally applicable payment rates for ser-
vices covered by the plan.
(6) This section does not require [ an insurer ] a carrier  to submit provider contracts to the de-
partment for review.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) “Carrier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(b) “Health professional shortage area” has the meaning given that term in 42 U.S.C.
254e.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 743A.058 is amended to read:
743A.058. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Audio only” means the use of  audio telephone technology, permitting real-time commu-
nication between a health care provider and a patient for the purpose  of diagnosis, consultation or
treatment.
(B) “Audio only” does not include:
(i) The use of facsimile, electronic mail or text messages.
(ii) The delivery of health services that are customarily delivered  by audio telephone technology
and customarily not billed as separate services  by a health care provider, such as the sharing of
laboratory results.
(b) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(c) “Health professional” means a person licensed, certified or registered  in this state to provide
health care services or supplies.
(d) “Health service” means  physical, oral and behavioral health treatment or service provided
by a health professional.
(e) “Originating site” means the physical location of the patient.
(f) “State of emergency” includes:
(A) A state of emergency declared by the Governor under ORS 401.165; or
(B) A state of public health emergency declared by the Governor under ORS 433.441.
(g) “Telemedicine” means the mode of  delivering health services using information and tele-
communication technologies to provide consultation and education  or to facilitate diagnosis, treat-
ment, care management or self-management of a patient’s health care.
(2) A health benefit plan  and a dental-only plan must provide coverage of a health service that
is provided using telemedicine if:
(a) The  plan provides coverage of the health service when provided in person by a health pro-
fessional;
(b) The health service is medically necessary;
(c) The health service is determined to be safely and  effectively provided using telemedicine
according to generally accepted health care practices and standards; and
(d) The application and technology used to provide the  health service meet all standards re-
quired by state and federal laws governing the privacy and security of protected health  information.
Enrolled Senate Bill 822 (SB 822-A) Page 3
(3) Except as provided in  subsection (4) of this section, permissible telemedicine applications and
technologies include:
(a) Landlines, wireless communications, the Internet and telephone networks; and
(b) Synchronous or asynchronous transmissions using audio only, video only, audio  and video
and transmission of data from remote monitoring devices.
(4) During a state of emergency, a health benefit plan or  dental-only plan shall provide coverage
of a telemedicine  service delivered to an enrollee residing in the geographic area specified in the
declaration of the state  of emergency, if the telemedicine service is delivered using any commonly
available technology, regardless  of whether the technology meets all standards required by state and
federal laws governing the privacy and security of protected health information.
(5) A health benefit plan and a dental-only plan may not:
(a) Distinguish  between rural and urban originating sites in providing coverage under subsection
(2) of this section or restrict originating sites that qualify for reimbursement.
(b) Restrict a health care  provider to delivering services only in person or only via telemedicine.
(c) Use telemedicine health care providers to meet network adequacy standards under  ORS
743B.505, except as permitted by  the Department of Consumer and Business Services under
criteria prescribed by the department by rule .
(d) Require an enrollee to have an established patient-provider  relationship with a provider to
receive telemedicine health services from the provider or  require an enrollee to consent to tele-
medicine services in person.
(e) Impose additional  certification, location or training requirements for telemedicine providers
or restrict the  scope of services that may be provided using telemedicine to less than a provider’s
permissible scope of practice.
(f) Impose  more restrictive requirements for telemedicine applications and technologies than
those specified in subsection (3) of this section.
(g) Impose on  telemedicine health services different annual dollar maximums or prior authori-
zation requirements than the annual dollar maximums and prior authorization requirements imposed
on the services if provided in person.
(h) Require a medical assistant or other health professional to be present with an enrollee at
the originating site.
(i) Deny an enrollee the choice to receive a health service in person or via telemedicine.
(j) Reimburse an out-of-network provider at a rate for telemedicine health services  that is dif-
ferent than the reimbursement paid to  the out-of-network provider for health services delivered in
person.
(k) Restrict a provider from providing telemedicine services across state  lines if the services are
within the provider’s scope of practice and:
(A) The provider has an established practice within this state;
(B) The provider’s employer operates health clinics or licensed  health care facilities in this
state;
(C) The provider has an established relationship with the patient; or
(D) The patient was referred to the  provider by the patient’s primary care or specialty provider
located in this state.
(L) Prevent a provider from prescribing, dispensing or administering drugs  or medical supplies
or otherwise providing  treatment recommendations to an enrollee after having performed an appro-
priate examination of the enrollee in person, through telemedicine or by the use of  instrumentation
and diagnostic equipment through which images and  medical records may be transmitted electron-
ically.
(m) Establish  standards for determining medical necessity for services delivered using telemedi-
cine that are higher than standards for determining medical necessity for services delivered in  per-
son.
(6) A health benefit plan and a dental-only plan shall:
Enrolled Senate Bill 822 (SB 822-A) Page 4
(a) Work  with contracted providers to ensure meaningful access to telemedicine services by as-
sessing an enrollee’s capacity to use telemedicine  technologies that comply with accessibility
standards, including alternate  formats, and providing the optimal quality of care for the enrollee
given the enrollee’s capacity;
(b) Ensure access to auxiliary aids and services to  ensure that telemedicine services accommo-
date the needs of enrollees who have difficulty communicating due to a medical condition, who  need
an accommodation due to disability or advanced age or who have limited English proficiency;
(c) Ensure  access to telemedicine services for enrollees who have limited English proficiency
or who are deaf or hard-of-hearing by providing interpreter  services reimbursed at the same rate
as interpreter services provided in person; and
(d) Ensure that telemedicine services  are culturally and linguistically appropriate and trauma-
informed.
(7) The coverage under subsection (2) of this section is subject to:
(a) The terms and conditions of the health benefit plan or dental-only plan; and
(b) Subject to subsection (8) of this section, the reimbursement specified  in the contract between
the plan and the health professional.
(8)(a) A health benefit plan and dental-only plan must pay the same reimbursement for a  health
service  regardless  of whether the service is provided in person or using any permissible telemedicine
application or technology.
(b) Paragraph (a)  of this subsection does not prohibit the use of value-based payment methods,
including capitated,  bundled, risk-based or other value-based payment methods, and does not require
that any value-based payment method reimburse telemedicine  health services based on an equivalent
fee-for-service rate.
(9) This section does not require a  health benefit plan or dental-only plan to reimburse a health
professional:
(a) For a health service that is not a covered benefit under the plan;
(b) Who has not contracted with the plan; or
(c) For a service that is not included  within the Healthcare Procedure Coding System or the
American Medical Association’s Current Procedural Terminology codes or related modifier codes.
(10) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
Enrolled Senate Bill 822 (SB 822-A) Page 5
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 822 (SB 822-A) Page 6